Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 23.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-1023
Structured parking, defined.

Structured
parking means a real estate development used primarily as a covered parking
facility for automobiles or related personal vehicles. The parking facility
must have a minimum of two levels of parking above or below ground.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 23.